Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Protection and Rights of Blind and Disabled Persons

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of § 302 of Americans with Disabilities Act (42 USCS § 12182), Prohibiting Discrimination on Basis of Disability by Owners or Operators of Places of Public Accommodation, 136 ALR Fed 1.

Remedies available under Americans with Disabilities Act (42 USC § 12101 et seq.), 136 ALR Fed 63.

Limitation of actions under the Americans With Disabilities Act (42 USC § 12101 et seq.), 144 ALR Fed 307.

§ 35-13-201.
Generally; service and assistance animals.

Any blind, visually impaired, deaf, hearing impaired person or other person with a disability, subject to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons:

Has the same right as an able-bodied person to the full and free use of the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities and other public places;

Shall be afforded full and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges of any place of public accommodation and any other place to which the general public is invited; and

Shall not be discriminated against in the leasing or rental of apartments and other private residential property because of his disability.

Any blind, visually impaired, deaf, hearing impaired person or other person with a disability may be accompanied by a service animal in any facility of a public entity in accordance with 28 C.F.R. 35.136 and any place of public accommodation in accordance with C.F.R. 36.302(c).

A person shall not be discriminated against in the leasing or rental of residential property because the person has an assistance animal, which shall be permitted in leased or rented residential property in accordance with the federal Fair Housing Act. The person shall be liable for any damage done by his assistance animal to the premises or facilities of the leased or rented residential property.

A public accommodation, or any agent or employee thereof, that permits a service animal or an animal believed in good faith to be a service animal in its place of public accommodation is not liable for any damage or injury caused by the animal.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 32, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 42-35.1; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-126; Laws 1983, ch. 88, § 1; 1987, ch. 213, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 3; 2001, ch. 170, § 2; 2017 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to gifts for the blind, see §

25-6-101

.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(ii), substituted “any place of public accommodation” for “all hotels, motels, lodging places, restaurants, public elevators, places of public accommodation amusement or resort”; in (b), substituted “animal in any facility of a public entity in accordance with
28 C.F.R. 35.136 and any place of public accommodation in accordance with
28 C.F.R. 36.302(c)” for “dog in any of the places listed in subsection (a) of this section without paying an extra charge for the service dog; and added (c) and (d).

Purpose. —

This statute does not accord the physically disabled status as a suspect class. The statute does, however, demonstrate that the Wyoming legislature recognized a need to prevent discrimination against disabled persons. Ellett v. State, 883 P.2d 940,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability and application of zoning regulations to single residences employed for group living of mentally retarded persons, 32 ALR4th 1018.

Who is recipient of, and what constitutes program or activity receiving, federal financial assistance for purposes of § 504 of Rehabilitation Act (29 U.S.C. § 794), which prohibits any program or activity receiving financial assistance from discriminating on basis of disability, 160 ALR Fed 297.

When are public entities required to provide services, programs, or activities to disabled individuals under Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12132, 160 ALR Fed 637.

When does a public entity discriminate against individuals in its provision of services, programs, or activities under the Americans with Disabilities Act,
42 U.S.C. §
12132 , 163 ALR Fed 339.

§ 35-13-202.
Drivers to take precautions; liability.

The driver of a vehicle approaching a blind, partially blind, deaf or hearing impaired pedestrian carrying a cane predominantly white or chrome metallic in color or using a guide dog shall take all necessary precautions to avoid injury to the pedestrian. Any driver failing to take these precautions is liable in damages for any injury caused the pedestrian.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 32, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 42-35.2; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-127; Laws 1983, ch. 88, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 3.

§ 35-13-203.
Interfering with rights; misrepresentation of a service or assistance animal; penalties.

Any person denying or interfering with admittance to or enjoyment of any place or facility referenced in W.S. 35-13-201(a) through (c) or otherwise interfering with the rights of the blind, partially blind, deaf, hearing impaired person or other person with a disability is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

Any person who knowingly and intentionally misrepresents that an animal is a service animal or an assistance animal for the purpose of obtaining any of the rights or privileges set forth in this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 32,§ 3; W.S. 1957, § 42-35.3; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-128; Laws 1983, ch. 88,§ 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 3; 2001, ch. 170, § 2; 2017 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “any place or facility referenced in
W.S.

35-13-201

(a) through (c)” for “the public facilities enumerated in
W.S.

35-13-201

”; and added (b).

§ 35-13-204.
Additional provisions on use of service dogs; penalty.

Any blind, partially blind, deaf, hearing impaired person or other person with a disability who is a passenger on any common carrier, airplane, motor vehicle, railroad train, motor bus, boat or any other public conveyance operating within the state may have with him a service dog.

Any person violating this section is subject to a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 8, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 42-35.4; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-129; Laws 1983, ch. 88, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 34, § 3; 2001, ch. 170, § 2.

§ 35-13-205.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 133, § 2.

“Person with a disability” means an individual who has a mental or physical impairment which substantially limits one (1) or more major life activities;

“Major life activities” means functions associated with the normal activities of independent daily living such as caring for one’s self, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing or speaking;

“Assistance animal” means an animal that works, provides assistance or performs tasks for the benefit of a person with a disability, or provides emotional support that alleviates one or more identified symptoms or effects of a person’s disability;

“Place of public accommodation” means as defined in 28 C.F.R. 36.104;

“Public accommodation” means as defined in 28 C.F.R. 36.104;

“Public entity” means as defined in 28 C.F.R. 35.104;

“Service animal” means as defined in 28 C.F.R. 35.104 and 28 C.F.R. 36.104 and includes service miniature horses pursuant to 28 C.F.R. 35.136 and 28 C.F.R. 36.302(c).

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 170, § 1; 2017 ch. 133, § 1, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(iv) through (a)(viii).

The second 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(i) which formerly read: ““Service dog” means a dog which has been or is being specially trained to the requirements of a person with a disability.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-13-206.
Injuring or killing a service or assistance animal prohibited; penalties.

Any person who knowingly, willfully and without lawful cause or justification inflicts, or permits or directs any animal under his control or ownership to inflict, serious bodily harm, permanent disability or death upon any service animal or assistance animal is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

A court shall order a defendant convicted of an offense under subsection (a) of this section to make restitution to the owner of the service animal or assistance animal for:

Related veterinary or medical bills;

The cost of replacing the service animal or assistance animal or retraining an injured service animal or assistance animal; and

Any other expense reasonably incurred as a result of the offense.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 41, § 1; 2017 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “animal or assistance animal” for “dog as defined in
W.S. 35-13-205(a)(i)”; in (b), substituted “animal or assistance animal” for dog; and in (b)(ii), substituted “animal or assistance animal or retraining an injured service animal or assistance animal” for “dog or retraining an injured service dog by an organization generally recognized by agencies involved in the rehabilitation of persons with disabilities as reputable and competent to provide special equipment for or special training to an animal to help a person with a disability.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 41, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.